Hawaii statutes.
[§352D-10] Regional directors; powers,
duties, and authority. The executive director shall appoint a regional
director in each county. Each regional director shall be exempt from chapter
76, and shall answer to the executive director. The regional director shall:

(1) Oversee the youth services centers located in the
director's region;

(2) Assist the executive director in coordinating,
monitoring, and evaluating all programs and activities operated by the office
within its region;

(3) Advise the executive director on any pertinent
issue related to the youth service system within the director's region; and

(4) Provide staff support for the regional advisory
board located in the director's region. [L 1991, c 258, pt of §2; am L 2000, c
253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next